Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Chapter 25. Watercraft.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, provides that certain sections of this chapter are to be amended or repealed “90 days after the date the chair of the Alaska Legislative Council notifies the revisor of statutes that in the previous state fiscal year the state did not receive and does not anticipate receiving federal funding for a statewide boating and safety education program; the director of the division of legislative finance shall notify the chair of the Alaska Legislative Council when the state, in the previous fiscal year, did not receive federal funding for a statewide boating and safety program; the chair of the Alaska Legislative Council may not give the notice described in this paragraph unless the notice is approved by a vote of a majority of the members of the Alaska Legislative Council.” As of May 2022, the required notice had not been given. In 2018, sec. 33, ch. 111, SLA 2018, amended sec. 27, ch. 28, SLA 2000, to remove certain sections of this chapter from the conditional repeal described in this note.

Section 1(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 provides that intervening amendments to those amended sections are not to be retained when those sections are amended under sec. 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000.